<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88708-0019 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-08-88.f2.A1018</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 131 / Friday, July 8, 1988 / ProposedRules <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Research and Special Programs Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">49 CFR Parts 192, 193 and 195 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[RSPA Docket No. PS-102] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Control of Drug Use in Natural Gas, Liquefied Natural Gas and HazardousLiquid Pipeline Operations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>agency: </T2>Research and Special Programs Administration (RSPA); DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>action: </T2>Notice of Proposed Rulemaking.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>summary: </T2>This notice proposes rules to require operators of pipelinefacilities, other than master meter systems, used for the transportationof natural gas or hazardous liquids, and operators who produce and storeliquefied natural gas, to have a drug program for individuals who performspecific sensitive safety and security-related functions. Testing underthese proposed rules would be conducted prior to employment after an accident,randomly, or on the basis of reasonable cause. In addition, these proposedrules would require that an operator provide an opportunity for counselingand rehabilitation in specified circumstances under an Employee AssistanceProgram (EAP) for certain individuals that have a drug problem. However,these proposed rules do not require that the employer run the EAP or payfor it. The proposed rules are intended to prevent the presence of a prohibiteddrug in an employee's system at any time, thereby ensuring a drug-freepipeline operations environment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>dates: </T2>RSPA is considering holding a public hearing on this proposalat a time and place to be announced shortly in the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>Any person who wants to make an oral statementat the hearing will be requested to notify the person listed under ``ForFurther Information Contact'' at least five working days prior to the dateof the hearing by telephone or mail. Written comments must be receivedon or before September 6, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>address: </T2>Send comments in duplicate to the Dockets Unit, Room8417, Office of Pipeline Safety, Research and Special Programs Administration,U.S. Department of Transportation, 400 Seventh Street, SW., Washington,DC 20590. Identify the docket and notice numbers stated in the headingof this notice. All comments and docketed material will be available forinspection and copying in room 8421 between 8:30 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. eachbusiness day. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>for further information contact: </T2>Cesar DeLeon, Assistant Directorfor Regulation, Office of Pipeline Safety, (202) 366-1640. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>supplementary information:</T2> <ITAG tagnum="84">Introduction: The Drug Problem in American Society </ITAG>Background Drug abuse constitutes a major societal problem. Statistics compiled andreported by the National Institute on Drugs and Abuse (NIDA), and mediapolls, indicate that the use of drugs is widespread across all age groups.For instance, data from the 1985 NIDA, ``National Survey on Drug Abuse''indicates the following projections based on a survey sample of respondents'reports of their own drug use: andbullet; In the age 18-25 category, of a total population of 32,490,000:_19,670,000 (60%) used marijuana sometime during their life; _7,110,000 (22%) used marijuana within the past month; _8,170,000 (25%) used cocaine sometime during their life; _2,510,000 (8%) used cocaine within the past month. andbullet; In the age 26 and over category, of a total population of 136,600,000:_37,000,000 (27%) used marijuana sometime during their life; _8,000,000 (6%) used marijuana within the past month; _12,950,000 (9%) used cocaine sometime during their life; _2,704,000 (2%) used cocaine within the past month. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Not only do these statistics raise concerns in those agencies chargedby Congress to administer transportation safety programs, they raise concernsin the public at large where the reasonable expectation exists that personsin sensitive safety and security-related transportation occupations shouldnot be drug abusers. The following are the results of a May-June 1986 nationalsurvey conducted by Populus Incorporated of Greenwich, Connecticut, andDecision/Making/Information of McLean, Virginia, concerning the generalpublic's views on the drug testing of individuals in various occupations.Of those surveyed: _88% favored testing of airline pilots and air traffic controllers. _85% favored testing of police and other law enforcement agents. _81% favored testing of bus drivers. _75% favored testing of military personnel. _75% favored testing employees of pharmaceutical companies. Further, the researchers indicated that those responding to the surveyfelt that ``people who are responsible for the physical safety of othersshould be tested.'' Because workers in all modes of transportation are``responsible for the physical safety of others,'' the testing of transportationworkers for drug abuse would be considered by the public as having a positiveeffect on public safety. A survey conducted by American Viewpoint, Inc.,on August 6-19, 1986, found that, ``by a margin of 75%_22%, Americans agreethat the drug crisis today is serious enough for mandatory testing.'' TheAmerican Viewpoint survey used a ``forced choice'' list and asked whichgroups should submit to mandatory drug testing. While employees in thetransportation modes were not included in the list (e.g., railroads, aviation,highways, pipelines, etc.), employees in sensitive safety and security-relatedoccupations such as police and fire fighters (84%), members of the armedforces (81%), and doctors and nurses (81%) were at the top of the listof those employees the respondents felt should be tested. Another interestingfacet of the study was that 80% of the respondents indicated that theywould participate in voluntary testing if asked to do so by their employer.These surveys suggest that a majority of the public is concerned aboutdrug abuse and favors the mandatory testing of persons in certain sensitivesafety and security-related occupations. While statistics indicate thatthe greatest incidence of drug abuse is found among those age 25 and under,and overall usage may drop as this group grows older, it is still of significancein older population groups. A recently issued Special Report From the Comptroller General of the UnitedStates titled ``Controlling Drug Abuse: A Status Report'' (1988 GAO Report)states that ``Drug abuse in the United States has persisted at a very highlevel throughout the 1980s. Drug abuse is a serious national problem thatadversely affects all parts of our society * * *.'' The Department of Transportation,acting in accordance with Congressional mandates to ensure safe transportation,must operate under the assumption that the various transportation modesdo not differ significantly from the overall population in terms of drugabuse. <ITAG tagnum="84">The Drug Problem in Pipeline Transportation </ITAG>Employees of the natural gas, liquefied natural gas (LNG), and hazardousliquid pipeline industries represent a broad and diverse cross-sectionof American society. It is reasonable to assume that the problem of drugabuse exists in this industry in similar proportion to that existing insociety as a whole. Personnel who use drugs can pose dangers to themselvesand co-workers and can cause or exacerbate events that may take human life,destroy property, and seriously harm the environment. The Department ofTransportation and the Research and Special Programs Administration (RSPA)are committed to the goal of a drug-free transportation system in all modesof transportation. Implementation of a drug abuse prevention program, includingeducation and awareness, testing, and rehabilitation, is necessary to ensurethat pipelines are operated in the safest manner possible. RSPA believes that the public expects, and is entitled to expect, thattransportation systems will be operated safely. The Department's drug abuseprevention initiative in this area was formulated in response to a potentialthreat to the safe operation of pipelines transporting natural gas, andhazardous liquids, as well as the production and storage of LNG. The potentialfor accidents caused by pipeline personnel whose skills may be impaireddue to drug usage will be greatly decreased by the implementation of adrug testing program. RSPA does not contend that drug abuse among personnel engaged in pipelinetransportation is present in any greater degree than in the general publicor that accident statistics demonstrate drug abuse as a major factor inpipeline accidents. No data exist to prove or disprove the presence ofa drug abuse problem among pipeline personnel. The number of pipeline incidentsis relatively low. We do know that a significant number of pipeline accidentsoccur because of outside force damage caused by excavators, over whom theDepartment has no authority. The remainder (65 percent) are due to suchcauses as operational error, the improper monitoring of corrosion, andequipment failure, all matters which can be adversely affected by the impairmentof specific pipeline personnel. Further, many routine construction, operations,and maintenance functions, as well as emergency response activities, demandskilled, competent, alert and unimpaired workers to perform the functionssafely. When a pipeline failure occurs, regardless of its cause, criticaldecisions must be made quickly to abate the risk and return the pipelineto safe operation. The ability of personnel to rapidly respond to sucha situation is crucial to the overall safety of pipeline operation. RSPA invites commenters to identify other indicators of the risks associatedwith drug use by employees performing sensitive safety and security-relatedfunctions. Commenters are specifically invited to submit data on the incidenceof drug use among employees subject to this proposal. <ITAG tagnum="84">Effects of Drug Use on Safety </ITAG>Drugs are chemicals that affect the body (physiological and function-alteringeffects) and often the mind (pharmacological or mind-altering effects).In broad summary, controlled substances are drugs or other substances identifiedby the government as creating a potential for abuse and/or dependency.In comments before the Federal Railroad Administration, the American MedicalAssociation and other parties have agreed that, as a general matter, controlledsubstances constitute the primary drugs of interest (other than alcohol)with respect to transportation safety. Most controlled substances have at least some accepted medical applications.Therapeutic use of certain controlled substances is frequently indicatedboth from a medical point of view and from the point of view of transportationsafety, since proper use of drugs can control disorders that adverselyaffect performance while permitting the individual to continue productiveemployment. If therapeutic drugs are used at appropriate levels establishedby medical practitioners and care is taken to monitor undesired ``sideeffects,'' safety will not be materially compromised. Indeed, in many cases,control of the underlying disorder will produce net safety benefits. However, when individuals make non-medical use of controlled substances,they often use illegal (``illicit'') drugs that have unacceptable mind-alteringand function-altering characteristics. Similarly, when individuals self-administerlegal (``licit'') drugs for non-medical purposes, or without proper medicalsupervision, adverse effects may result. Drugs and Their Effects Controlled substances are classified by pharmacological properties as_andbullet; Narcotics, such as the opiate-based drugs; andbullet; Central nervous system (CNS) depressants, such as the barbiturates,tranquilizers, or methaqualone: andbullet; CNS stimulants, such as cocaine and amphetamines; andbullet; Hallucinogens, such as LSD and PCP; and andbullet; Cannabis (marijuana derivatives). All controlled substances have a potential for abuse, and many have a highpotential for dependence. The effects of these drugs vary to some extentby dosage, subject, frequency of use, route of ingestion, and pattern ofuse. An individual drug user may be affected differently by the same dosageon different occasions as a result of degree of fatigue, physical disorders,biorhythms, acquired tolerance, and other factors. It is important to note that the effects of drugs on human performanceare not limited to a perceived ``high'' or other immediate mind-alteringsensation experience by the user. Instead, drug effects are complex and,in many cases, long-lived. They include_ andbullet; <T3>Acute </T3>effects, including the often sought-after change of mentalstate and physiological changes; andbullet; <T3>After</T3>-effects, from individual doses or series of doses; andbullet; <T3>Chronic </T3>effects from prolonged use, which may include profoundbiochemical changes and changes in cognitive functions; and andbullet; <T3>Withdrawal </T3>effects when a drug-dependent individual ceases useof the drug. All of these potential effects are of concern with respectto transportation safety, yet only the acute effects correlate to someextent in time with body fluid concentrations of the impairing substance;and for most drugs that correlation is imperfect. Perceived Dangers of Drugs in Transportation The potential detrimental effects of drugs on performance are not a matterof speculation. There is a broad consensus among transportation companies,employees and related professionals that the use of alcohol and the non-medicaluse of controlled substances are not consistent with safety. Increasingly,knowledgeable safety professionals in transportation are coming to realizethat ``off-duty use'' and ``on-duty use'' are not distinct categories warrantingentirely separate consideration, but are instead facets of an overall picture_<T3>i.e., </T3>fitness for duty involving sensitive safety and security-relatedfunctions. Although there are differences of opinion among transportationsafety experts concerning appropriate countermeasures, the need for effectivecountermeasures is almost universally acknowledged. Experimental/Clinical Data A growing body of information related to drug effects on safety has influencedthe opinion held by those in the transportation industry concerning theeffects of drug use on the industry. Numerous behavioral studies and extensiveclinical experience have established the fact that controlled substancescan powerfully alter the capacity of human beings to respond appropriatelyto their environment. The following considers how drugs adversely affect safety. Since each humanbeing is, biologically, a unique and whole organism, any such discussionwill suffer from incompleteness, on the one hand, and an absence of totalanalytical integration, on the other. However, the available literaturedoes offer useful information that can be placed in the appropriate contextand that can guide the formulation of public policy. Among other sources,this discussion draws heavily on a draft study prepared by the TransportationSystems Center of the Department of Transportation. A copy of that report(Sussman, Salvatore, Huntley and Hobbs, ``Data Available on the Impactof Drug Use on Transportation Safety,'' April 17, 1987) will be placedin the docket of this rulemaking. Drug effects can be analyzed in experimental studies from the point ofview of their impact on particular human faculties. These faculties are,of course, merely aspects of human performance capabilities, and experimentalstudies often involve tasks that may call on more than one faculty. ``Sensoryfunction'' refers to the ability of an individual to detect, feel, identify,discriminate between, and recognize objects and conditions. Visual acuityand perception are the sensory functions whose impairment would be mostdetrimental to the safe functioning of a transportation employee. ``Motorperformance'' is also important to the safe functioning of an employee.This involves the ability to make timely, accurate, and steady controlmovements, and includes both simple and complex reaction time, as wellas tracking and steadiness. ``Vigilance'' describes another ability necessary to safe performance.``Vigilance'' is the term used to describe the ability of an individualto detect and respond to extremely infrequent signals provided as a partof a low event or boring task. Maintaining attention and alertness is importantfor all transportation operators, particularly during night operations.Finally, ``cognitive functions'' are of importance to safe operation. Thisrefers to the ability to classify, store, intergrate and recall information.Judgment, memory, proclivity for risk-taking, and the ability to managemultiple tasks are areas of particular concern for transportation. The available evidence indicates that all controlled substances tend, toa greater or lesser degree, to affect adversely one or more of the facultiescritical to safe conduct of transportation and transportation-related duties.In some cases, acute effects may be of greatest concern, while with otherdrugs the primary hazards may relate to after effects and chronic effects.Some individuals may be unimpaired by some drugs at some dosages with respectto certain faculties relevant to performance. Indeed, in certain discretesettings CNS stimulants may temporarily enhance the ability of an individualto sustain attention (as an acute effect). However, when the full rangeof effects is considered, no controlled substance can be eliminated asa source of significant concern. Narcotics are among the drugs having the highest potential for abuse anddependence, and use of narcotics is therefore unlikely to be limited tooff-duty hours. Narcotics dull the perception of external and internalstimuli and tend to induce a feeling of pleasant lethargy. These drugscan adversely affect motor performance, as well as vigilance. Althoughthere is no extensive body of literature on the effects of narcotics ontasks common to transportation, standard therapeutic practice requireswarning that narcotics should not be used by transportation or heavy equipmentoperators except where side effects have been determined and then onlyunder strict medical supervision. CNS depressants include a variety of compounds that reduce sensitivityto stimuli, slow information processing, and impair the ability of theuser to concentrate or focus attention. Behavioral studies of the acuteeffects of CNS depressants have demonstrated decline of motor performance,including tracking skills, simple reaction time, and choice reaction time.Depressants may adversely affect sensory functions such as signal recognitionand cognitive functions such as short-term memory and information processing.Experimental evidence also shows that after-effects of depressant use (hangovers)can impair performance. Further, most CNS depressants have a high dependencypotential, and severe withdrawal symptoms can result if use is discontinuedsuddenly. Since the timing of withdrawal symptoms is not always predictable,the cessation of use by a depressant-dependent person can result in lossof control over a transportation vehicle or task. Instances of severe withdrawalfrom alcohol, involving convulsions and loss of control, have been reportedin the aviation context; and withdrawal from other CNS depressants presentsrisks of equal gravity. CNS stimulants such as cocaine and amphetamines tend to increase mentalactivity, responsiveness to external stimuli, and in some cases restoreconcentration to fatigued individuals. These apparently benign qualitiesmake stimulants (particularly amphetamines) attractive ``operational''drugs (taken in an effort to sustain or enhance performance), as well asso-called ``recreational drugs.'' The non-regulated stimulant caffeineis taken for similar purposes. However, powerful stimulants do not avoid fatigue, but only postpone itand thereby compound its severity. Side effects may include restlessness,increased anxiety, and confusion. Transportation employees may rely uponthe drug for periods which go beyond its period of effectiveness, resultingin the sudden onset of deep sleep. Sustained reliance on amphetamines mayresult in toxic effects such as paranoia and delirium, since increasingdoses are needed to offset developing tolerance. While it is widely heldthat stimulants do not produce true physical dependence, it is also recognizedthat they can induce a strong psychological dependence. Recent experience with cocaine has confirmed the dependency-producing characterof that drug, its potent psychoactivity, its ability to induce seizuresafter a single dose, and its ability to produce psychosis after chronicuse. <T3>See, e.g., Cocaine: Pharmacology, Effects, and Treatment of Abuse,</T3>Research Monograph Series. No. 50 (National Institute on Drug Abuse1984). Reports of drug experiences suggest strongly that cocaine use maypromote risk-taking and cause the user to over-estimate his degree of control.Cocaine is not an attractive ``operational'' drug because of its shortduration, but use by an employee prior to reporting for work may resultin depression or exacerbate fatigue, leaving the employee poorly equippedto undertake a full work day. Because dependency on cocaine may manifestitself abruptly after a long period of apparently successful ``occasional''use, the cocaine abuser's private ``recreation'' may become a matter ofpublic safety concern at any time without warning. Although no experimental studies reflecting effects of stimulants overan extended time period have been reported, clinical experience suggeststhat these substances have a significant potential for producing behavioralchanges inimical to safety, particularly when used in high concentrationsor over a long period of time. Hallucinogens are ingested for the specific purpose of inducing euphoriaand a distortion of time and space. These drugs generally produce relaxationand a shortened attention span. Hallucinogens have not been the subjectof responsible scientific research involving human subjects because oftheir capacity to produce psychotic reactions. Use of hallucinogens isof particular concern, since they may trigger mental distrubances thatcan last for extended periods or recur without warning. Marijuana is sometimes classified as a hallucinogen but has propertiesthat warrant its separate treatment. As the most popular illicit drug ofabuse, marijuana was once viewed by many Americans as a mild and relativelyharmless substance. However, as the potency of marijuana available on theillicit market increased and a large segment of the population gained experienceon its use, it became apparent that marijuana had emerged as a major publichealth and safety risk. By 1980, it could be said that marijuana impairs learning ability and interfereswith complex psychomotor performance, including driving. <T3>Marijuana Research Findings: 1980. </T3>Research Monograph Series No.31 (National Institute on Drug Abuse). In addition, marijuana became morewidely recognized as a threat to health. Institute of Medicine, NationalAcademy of Sciences, <T3>Marijuana and Health </T3>(National Academy Press 1982). According to the experimental studies, marijuana affects such sensory functionsas visual acuity, signal detection, and balance or standing steadiness.Motor performance on flight similator tasks was adversely affected, aswere tracking tasks and pursuit rotor tracking. Closed-course and citydriving tests both indicated reduced driving precision, some of which theInstitute on Medicine (<T3>Id. </T3>at 118) assessed as indicating impairment of judgment as wellas care handling skills. Laboratory studies have also demonstrated reduced vigilance in signal detectiontasks. Studies evaluating cognitive functions indicate that marijuana mayreduce risk taking, but also show that marijuana reduces performance individed attention situations. Recent research has suggested the possibility of next-day after effectsfrom marijuana that may reduce performance on complex divided attentiontasks. Yesavage, Leirer, Denari and Hollister, ``Carry-Over Effects ofMarijuana Intoxication on Aircraft Pilot Performance: A Preliminary Report''(<T3>Am. J. Psychiatry </T3>142: 1325-1329 (1985)). Some experts also believethat the accumulation of cannabinoids in the body through chronic use mayproduce adverse effects that do not abate at any time while the marijuanahabit is sustained. Since marijuana metabolites have been identified atlow levels in the urine for as long as 77 days after cessation of heavyand chronic use, the possibility of significant chronic effects cannotbe excluded. <T3>See </T3>Ellis, Mann, Judson, Schramm and Tashchian, ``Excretion Patternsof Cannabinoid Metabolites After Last Use in a Group of Chronic Users''(<T3>Clin. Pharmacol. Ther. </T3>38:573-578 (1985)). In summary, drugs in each of the classes of controlled substances havemind and function-altering effects on the human subject. Recent researchinvolving several widely-used drugs vividly illustrates the correlationamong clinical data, theoretical pharmacology, and performance on transportation-relatedtasks. Smiley, Moskowitz, and Ziedman, ``Effects of Drugs on Driving'',DHHS Publication No. (ADM) 85-1386 (National Institute on Drug Abuse andNational Highway Traffic Safety Administration 1985). Smiley, <T3>et al., </T3>examined the effects of secobarbital and diazepam (CNSdepressants), marijuana and alcohol in a complex, blind study using a drivingsimulator. The study measured performance on a variety of driving tasks,including stop or swerve decisions, tracking, passing, and maintainingdistance at two dosage levels for each drug. The results revealed differencesin particular effects and performances on individual phases of the study.However, when the data were combined the authors concluded as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Secobarbital, diazepam, marijuana, and alcohol were all found to impairperformance of a variety of simulated driving tasks. Drug levels testedfor secobarbital and diazepam were therapeutic doses; the marijuana doseswere considered moderate to strong by the subject population used; thealcohol effects were reported for levels up to and slightly above the legallimit. <T3>No clear-cut differences in the pattern of effects were found amongthe drugs tested. </T3>All drugs impaired perceptual-motor skills (<T3>e.g., </T3>tracking, speed and headway control), perceptual tasks whereresponse time and detection ability were measured, and decisionmaking tasks.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T3>Id. </T3>at 19 (emphasis supplied). This research suggests that thesubtle differences in the way certain drugs affect human functions maybe less important than the overall disordering effect of those drugs onthe user's ability to respond to the complex challenges posed by the transportationenvironment. Finally, as noted above, many of the detrimental effects of drugs relatenot so much to the toxic or acute action of the drug when it may be foundin high concentrations in the blood stream, but rather the chronic or cumulativeaction of the drug on the body and the mind. Much of this long-term impairmentof the organism is poorly understood, but what is known is a source ofconcern. Epidemiological Studies The optimal approach to evaluating the effects of drugs on safety wouldinclude a program to ascertain the presence of drug use in an adequatesample of accidents and the development of good data on the incidence ofdrug use in the same population. By this means it would be possible toascertain the relative risk presented by the drug user in relation to thenon-user. Stated differently, it would be possible to ascertain whetherthe user was over-represented in the relevant population. Over a periodof years, analysis of this kind has permitted the Department of Transportation,through its National Highway Traffic Safety Administration, to determinethe role of alcohol in highway accidents. A variety of methodological problems make such an undertaking for otherdrugs difficult, if not ultimately impossible. Drug abuse incidence isknown to vary to a considerable extent by the demographics of the population,and the various regulated transportation modes employ workforces that arenot of the same composition. Thus, any study would have to discriminatecarefully by transportation mode.In recent years, a variety of countermeasures have been attempted to addressdrug abuse in transportation. Some of these have had positive effects,and no doubt some of these effects have waned with the passage of time.This likely volatility in drug abuse incidence creates a moving target,making comparisons of relative risk very difficult.Further, when focused on a relatively small population within an industry,any attempt to measure drug use incidence among those involved in accidentswill itself likely affect drug use incidence, since detection will producesome degree of general deterrence. Until recently, incidence of drug useamong those involved in accidents has not been determined on a routinebasis, and adequate data is not yet available from the initial effortsto make appropriate comparisons, even if incidence of use in the generalpopulation were reliably determined.Proceeding in the absence of an incidence/over-representation study isdifficult, at best. Those most popular illicit drugs, marijuana and cocaine,are eliminated from the blood very quickly after last use. While alcoholis somewhat readily distinguished as to likely involvement by use of bloodalcohol levels, the very complex effects of other drugs make a blood concentrationapproach less useful. Attempts to obtain good post-accident toxicologyare only now beginning to provide data that may, in combination with carefulfield investigations, provide sufficient anecdotal evidence to evaluate,at least on a qualitative basis, the true involvement of drugs in transportationaccidents. However, the limited epidemiological data that do exist suggest that theinferences drawn from experimental and clinical data are warranted. A studyof 440 fatally injured young California drivers detected alcohol in 70percent of the drivers, marijuana in 37 percent, and cocaine in 11 percent.Each of 24 other drugs was detected in fewer than 5 percent of the fatallyinjured group. Although only alcohol could be clearly ``associated withcrash responsibility'' within the limitations of the available data, theauthors concluded that the role of marijuana in automobile crashes needsfurther investigation. Williams, Peat, Crouch, Wells, and Finkle. ``Drugsin Fatally Injured Young Male Drivers'' (<T3>Public Health Reports</T3> 100:19-25 (1985)).A detailed study of 497 drivers injured in motor vehicle accidents andtreated in a Rochester, New York, hospital found that 38 percent of thedrivers had alcohol or another drug in their systems. Alcohol was foundin 25 percent, marijuana in 9.5 percent, and tranquilizers in 7.5 percent.Culpability was determined for accident causation from police reports andinterviews. Alcohol showed the highest culpability rate (74 percent athigh BAC), but marijuana users also had a high culpability rate of 53 percent,in contrast to drug-free drivers (34 percent). The culpability rate fortranquilizer users was less than that of drug-free drivers, and the bloodlevels determined were consistent with therapeutic doses which suggeststhat the use of prescription medications is not per se hazardous. Theseresults were considered conservative, since drivers were not required toprovide blood samples, and many refused. However, the relatively smallnumber of drivers surveyed permitted the authors to determine culpabilityat a level deemed statistically significant only for alcohol. Terhune andFell, ``The Role of Alcohol, Marijuana, and Other Drugs in the Accidentsof Injured Drivers'', NHTSA Technical Report DOT-HS-806-181 (Revised-March1982).Both of the foregoing studies noted a substantial number of cases in whichdrug use was combined with alcohol use. The polydrug phenomenon both suggeststhe hazard of relying on countermeasures directed exclusively to alcoholand complicates the evaluation of drug involvements. This dilemma is particularlycritical when it is considered that employed drug abusers may elect touse drugs other than alcohol on the job precisely for the purpose of avoidingdetection. ConclusionsThe full extent of drug effects and the dose-response characteristics ofindividual drugs on particular subjects is the subject of continuing study.Such study could be expected to continue indefinitely, even if the pharmacopeiawere a closed class and a steady stream of new compounds were not beingintroduced into licit and illicit marketplaces on a daily basis. But thefact that continuing study is warranted does not mean that no other actionis appropriate. It is important to draw reasonable conclusions from theavailable data that can help to protect the public safety.The only responsible conclusion that can be drawn from available evidenceis that the non-medical use of controlled substances among transportationemployees in sensitive safety and security-related functions constitutesa clear threat to the public safety. The threat flows from the after-effects,chronic effects, and withdrawal effects of these substances, as well asthe more heavily-researched acute affects. Any set of countermeasures musttherefore encourage drug abusers in the subject populations to abate theirhabits or seek treatment for their chemical dependencies, as appropriate.<ITAG tagnum="84">Jurisdiction </ITAG>The two primary statutes under which RSPA administers the pipeline safetyprogram are the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968 (NGPSA), as amended(49 App. U.S.C. 1671 <T3>et seq.</T3>), and the Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Act of 1979(HLPSA), as amended (49 App. U.S.C. 2001 <T3>et seq.</T3>). Under both statutes, RSPA develops and implements minimumFederal safety standards for operators of natural gas, liquefied naturalgas, and hazardous liquid pipelines. RSPA also regulates operators of offshoregas gathering lines under the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act (49App. U.S.C. 1801 <T3>et seq.</T3>). In the case of interstate pipelines, enforcement isperformed by the Federal Office of Pipeline Safety (OPS). In the case ofintrastate pipelines, enforcement is performed predominantly by the Stateenforcement personnel. In the latter case, pursuant to statutory authorizationand upon filing an annual certification with the Department, a State enforcesthe Federal standards adopted by the State under its independent regulatoryauthority. If adopted, these proposed rules would become part of the Federalpipeline safety regulations, 49 CFR Parts 192, 193, and 195, and wouldin turn be adopted by and enforced by the States with respect to the intrastatepipelines under their jurisdiction.Authority to implement drug education, awareness and testing programs isderived from the broad authority granted in the above cited statutes. Thisauthority is applicable to various aspects of pipeline facilities affectingpipeline safety, including ``design, installation, inspection, emergencyplans and procedures, testing, construction, extension, operation, replacement,and maintenance of pipeline facilities.'' 49 App. U.S.C. 1672 and 2002.Under this authority, OPS can set qualifications, such as experience andtraining, for pipeline personnel. In fact, OPS has set technical qualificationrequirements for welders.The proposed rule will take the obvious next step by establishing standardsfor ensuring that operator personnel directly affecting the safety of pipelinetransportation are free of drug induced impairment that may affect thesafety of the pipeline.<ITAG tagnum="84">Goals of Testing</ITAG>The objective of drug testing is to ensure a drug-free transportation systemenvironment which will enhance overall safety and assure public confidence.A drug-free environment means that an individual covered by these proposals<T3>may not have drugs in his or her system at levels above certain testlimits at any time. </T3>If drugs are discovered in quantities above thoselimits, individuals may face the possibility of losing their right to performthe specific sensitive safety and security-related functions for whichdrug testing is required. Thus, even if an individual uses drugs ``offduty'', if the evidence of the use remains in the system above the establishedlevels during ``on-duty'' hours, it would require action under this rule.The implementation of drug testing would serve as a deterrent to drug useby inducing employees to seek help based on fear of detection through drugtesting. Employees who are voluntarily undergoing rehabilitation would,in all likelihood, be subject to a special testing schedule contained intheir rehabilitation program in place of the random tests which would beapplicable to employees in general.Additionally, implementation of drug testing would enable RSPA to collectdata. Currently, very little data exists evidencing the extent of drugabuse in the pipeline transportation industry. A random sampling programwould enable the Office of Pipeline Safety to collect statistically validand representative data on usage and extent of usage in the pipeline industry.RSPA would collect, consider, and evaluate data on such things as age andoccupational position of users, and type of drugs used. This data wouldenable RSPA to assist the industry in more effectively combatting substanceabuse through rehabilitation, further education, training, and testingprograms. The RSPA is very interested in receiving any additional dataon the use of controlled substances by pipeline personnel.<ITAG tagnum="84">Overview of the Proposed Drug Program</ITAG>A drug program would be established by pipeline operators for individualswho perform specific sensitive safety and security-related functions. Pipelineoperators covered by these proposals would include all operators subjectto regulation under either 49 CFR Parts 192, 193, or 195, except for mastermeter operators. This includes small municipal gas systems. This rule doesnot propose to cover master meter operators since they do not usually performthe functions traditionally considered as operating or maintaining a pipeline.The gas distribution company is responsible for the operational characteristicsof the pipeline system. Therefore, the types of incidents that would arise,such as leaks or explosions, would not be prevented by the drug testingof master meter operators. Comments are requested as to whether this approachis valid. RSPA also invites comments as to what methods might be used tofacilitate the inclusion of other small operators in the program and whetherall other small operators should be required to develop and implement adrug abatement program. Commenters who believe that the proposed rule shouldnot cover such entities, either in whole or in part, should explain thebasis for their views and describe how they would define small operatorsfor this purpose.The proposed drug program would be composed of two parts: the first partwould be testing for drugs to detect users and to deter future drug use;the second part would be an ongoing and active ``preventive'' program thatwould offer Employee Assistance Program services including rehabilitation,education, and training. The two parts of the program are complementaryand mutually supportive because the problem of drug abuse must be addressedfrom several perspectives. Pipeline operators would test, or ensure thatthe contractors test, individuals who directly or indirectly perform specifiedsensitive safety and security-related functions for those operators forprohibited drug levels above limits set by the proposed rule. These individualswould generally include a large portion of an operator's operation andmaintenance staff (including operator contractor employees). Comments arerequested as to whether pipeline inspectors who are employed by the Statesshould be subject to drug testing.Under the proposed drug program, the operator would be required to conductthe following types of testing: pre-employment testing for all applicantsfor safety-related jobs; post-accident testing for employees or contractoremployees directly involved in an accident; random testing; and testingbased on reasonable cause. The test regimen would include an initial testfollowed by a more specific confirmation test if the initial test werepositive. This testing would be required to be carried out according tothe HHS guidelines. Each operator would be required to make sure that anytesting conformed to these guidelines. Failure by the employer to do so,like any failure by a regulated party to comply with a RSPA safety rule,makes the employer subject to RSPA enforcement action, including civilpenalties.Under the proposed rule, employers would have 120 days from the effectivedate of the final rule in which to develop a drug plan. Under Parts 192and 195, the drug plan would be required to be incorporated into the operator'soperating and maintenance plan (Oandamp;M Plan). Under Part 193, the drugplan would be required to be incorporated into the operator's personnelhealth plan. The drug plan would be required to be implemented 180 daysafter the plan is incorporated into the Oandamp;M or personnel health plan.Several Administrations within the Department of Transportation have developedproposed rules that would mandate drug testing, and would require thatdrug programs formulated in the private sector be submitted to them forapproval prior to being implemented. RSPA invites comments on whether itis necessary as well as feasible to require that drug programs mandatedby the proposed rule be submitted to RSPA for approval. One possible solutionis to require the plans to be submitted and to have them go into effecta set number of days after their submission unless RSPA determines thatthey are inadequate and notifies the submitter of the inadequacy. RSPAalso invites comments on whether employers should have the flexibilityto develop company-specific drug abatement programs and submit such programsto RSPA for approval in lieu of following the RSPA-proposed program. RSPAis also interested in comments on ways in which the policy behind thisNPRM can be achieved through procedures or programs without the need fordetailed regulatory requirements.An Employee Assisted Program (EAP) is an important component of the proposeddrug program. Minimum requirements for rehabilitation, education, and traininghave been included in the proposed rule and are discussed below. This proposedrule would not prohibit employers from adopting and enforcing additionalor more stringent procedures which are not inconsistent with the proposedrule. However, under certain circumstances and alternatives as discussed<T3>infra, </T3>an employee, other than a temporary employee, may not bedisciplined or fired upon receipt of their first positive drug test, ifthe individual agrees to participate in an EAP.The issue of testing for alcohol is not included in this rulemaking. Alcoholtesting is not being proposed because the two preferred methods of testingan individual for the presence of alcohol are by breath analysis and bydrawing blood. It tests were run for alcohol and for drugs, two differenttypes of tests (blood alcohol concentration and urinalysis) would haveto be conducted since urinalysis has been chosen as the method by whichdrugs would be tested for. This would greatly complicate the process aswell as increase costs. Also, the blood test method generally is consideredto be a more invasive procedure. Finally, it is easier to identify someonewho abuses alcohol and reports for work impaired than someone who usesdrugs.  <ITAG tagnum="84">Who Would Establish a Drug Program  </ITAG>Both the NGPSA and the HLPSA place the responsibility for compliance withsafety regulations on the pipeline operator. In enforcement, RSPA has consistentlytaken this position and held the operator responsible for compliance evenwhen the operator contracts out part or all of its sensitive safety andsecurity-related functions. Therefore, it is reasonable to place the responsibilityfor testing on the operator to ensure that all individuals who performsensitive safety and security-related functions for the operator are drug-free.Operators would be required to include a drug testing plan conforming tothe proposed rule in their operating and maintenance or their personnelhealth plans. The operator may provide in its contract with a contractorthat the testing, training, and rehabilitation required by its drug testingplan be carried out by the contractor. However, the operator would remainresponsible for ensuring that the terms of its drug testing plan are compliedwith. In addition, the operator would remain responsible for ensuring thatemployees who fail a drug test do not perform sensitive safety and security-relatedfunctions until successful rehabilitation has taken place. Finally, theoperator would have to ensure that the contractor would allow access bythe operator, by RSPA, and by State Pipeline Safety Representatives, toproperty and records kept by the contractor for the purpose of monitoringthe operator's compliance with the proposed rule. This raises privacy questionsthat are discussed below.  <ITAG tagnum="4">Who Would Be Tested  </ITAG>Under the proposed rule, all employees performing sensitive safety andsecurity-related functions would be tested. These functions might includewelding, radiography, dispatching, pressure testing, joining plastic pipeline,security and emergency response. Comments are requested as to how ``sensitivesafety and security-related'' functions should be defined, and which specificfunctions should trigger the testing requirement. Commenters addressingthese issues should provide empirical evidence to support their comments. <ITAG tagnum="84">What Drugs Would Be Tested For  </ITAG>The proposed rule would require that during each test required by the rule,the presence of marijuana, cocaine, opiates, amphetamines, and phencyclidine(PCP) be tested for. In reasonable cause or post-accident testing, theemployer may test for any substance specified in Schedule I or II of theControlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. 801.812 (1981 andamp; 1987 Cum. P.P.).RSPA invites comments as to which additional drugs, if any, should be included.Commenters should also provide cost and benefit data regarding any additionaldrug groups.  <ITAG tagnum="84">What Method Would Be Used  </ITAG>RSPA proposes to require chemical testing, urinalysis, to verify that individualsperforming sensitive safety and security-related functions in pipelinetransportation are drug free. Urinalysis was chosen on the basis of cost,simplicity in taking samples, and effectiveness of testing equipment andprocedures. Specimen collection and testing would be conducted as providedin the Department of Health and Human Services Scientific and TechnicalGuidelines for Drug Testing Programs (HHS Guidelines).  <ITAG tagnum="84">When Testing Would Be Conducted  </ITAG>RSPA is proposing that operators conduct four types of testing: (1) Beforeemployment, (2) after an accident, (3) at random, and (4) based on reasonablecause. RSPA is not proposing periodic testing because the pipeline industrydoes not have periodic physical examinations. These types of testing, eachspecific to certain circumstances, together form a part of a deterrentor preventive drug program. The types of testing are described as follows: 1. <T3>Pre-employment testing</T3> would be required of all applicants forspecified sensitive safety and security-related positions. The purposeof testing applicants is two-fold: One, it would convey a clear messagethat the employer is serious about establishing and maintaining a drug-freeenvironment; and two, it would help indentify those who are either addictedto or so dependent upon drugs that they cannot abstain from drug use. Alltests that produce positive results for drugs would be confirmed usinga method of testing as specified in the HHS guidelines. Applicants wouldbe informed that tests will be conducted to determine the presence of drugs.Although pre-employment testing would not necessarily identify those individualswho temporarily abstain to avoid detection, it would help to ensure thathabitual abusers are not selected for sensitive and security-related positions.An applicant would not be hired after receiving a confirmed positive test.Applicants could withdraw an application after a confirmed positive testand the record of the test would be destroyed. 2. <T3>Post-accident testing. </T3>Employees who perform sensitive safetyand security-related functions as described in the proposed rule, and whoseperformance of that function is directly related to an accident, wouldbe required to provide a urine sample for drug testing under the proposedrule. An employee involved in an accident would be selected for testingbased on a decision made by the operator or authorized government personnel(e.g., inspectors) that such testing is necessary. The employer or governmentofficial must consider the extent of an individual's involvement in theaccident when selecting employees for testing.3. <T3>Random (or Random Sampling) testing </T3>is expected to be the primarymethod used in the drug program to deter drug use. Random testing can bean extremely effective method for decreasing drug use because abstinencefrom continued use is the only way to prepare for an unannounced test.The success of random drug screening has been demonstrated in various programs.The United States Coast Guard implemented a random testing program forits uniformed personnel which led to a 75 percent decrease in drug useover a five-year period. RSPA requests commenters to address whether theexperience of uniformed personnel in the Coast Guard program is a validindicator of how pipeline employees would respond to a similar program.Random testing avoids potential bias toward, and selective harassment of,an employee because every employee has an equal chance for selection atany time. Random selection is usually accomplished through scientificallyaccepted methods such as the use of a random-number table or computer-based,random-number generator. Both methods select individuals by matching theserandomly selected numbers against an employee's social security numberor payroll account number. With random testing, abstinence is the onlyalternative to possible detection. Using a true random selection basis,employees selected for each weekly or monthly increment would be returnedto the poll of those eligible for testing and would be subject to reselection.The vulnerability for reselection deters drug abuse because an individualselected early in the testing cycle would still be subject to testing throughoutthe remainder of the year and would still risk detection if he or she useddrugs after the first test. One feature of this plan is that some employeesmight not be selected at all and others could be selected more than oncea year. In addition, although surprise is an essential feature of a truerandom testing program, when an employee is located in a remote locationand must be transported some distance to provide a sample, the elementof surprise may be lost in many cases. RSPA seeks comment on how to dealwith these problems.Random drug testing requires a specific implementation plan to deter druguse. The proposed rules would require that up to 125 percent of employeesperforming specific sensitive safety and security-related functions wouldbe tested each year. This does not mean that testing would be carried outat the 125% rate, but denotes a cap upon the rate to be chosen. RSPA intendsto select an appropriate rate based on effectiveness, deterrence, costs,and benefits. Comments are requested as to what the proper percentage shouldbe and data supporting this view is also requested. How would differentsampling rates affect the numbers of drug users who volunteer for rehabilitationunder each of the rehabilitation options? Is there any evidence to supportalternative assumptions regarding the rates at which drug users would volunteerfor rehabilitation? What is the lowest sampling rate for random testingthat would be effective in deterring drug abuse? Would higher samplingrates result in sufficiently higher benefits to justify the costs? Do lowersampling rates necessarily result in lower benefits? Is reasonable to assumethat benefits are directly proportional to the sampling rate? Would thehigher sampling rate add sufficient deterrence to reduce the costs of andneed for rehabilitation? Would a lower sampling rate be more effectiveif the severity of the sanction is increased? RSPA is also consideringwhether programs should provide for adjustment of the minimum samplingrule based upon the success of the program. Although a numerical targetis needed as a benchmark for discussion, in actual practice there may comea point of sharply diminishing returns from any set level as the mix ofcountermeasures detects most chronic substance abuse and deters casualuse. The testing program could be designed so that it could be phased upor down as appropriate and in response to the pattern of results obtainedthrough the program. In combination with post-accident testing experiences,the results of random testing would provide the most useful gauge of theneed. RSPA is considering whether there are circumstances under which theprogram should allow for the level of effort to be increased or scaledback based on a method of evaluation stated in the rule or, if an approvalprocess is used, based on individual applications and specifically requestscomments on this issue. RSPA also solicits comments on whether companiesthat develop exemplary records should be relieved at some future time fromsome or all of the requirements of this proposal. As with other issues,RSPA reserves the right to make appropriate adjustments in the rule inresponse to public comments. RSPA also requests comments as to whetherthe rule should contain a provision allowing a company with a high levelof safety with regard to drug use, demonstrated over a designated timeperiod, more latitude in determining the application of its drug program.RSPA believes that an operator-sponsored program is the most effectiveform of random testing. The operator has an interest in ensuring that itspipeline operations are conducted by employees who do not use controlledsubstances. The DOT is mandating that pipeline operators, as well as operatorsin other transportation modes, be subject to random drug testing. Thiswill assist in achieving a drug-free transportation environment. We realizethat there may be difficulties in applying these types of testing to smalloperators. Comment is requested on the problems inherent in such an applicationand solutions that would ensure an effective random testing program forsmall operators. For example, could small operators form consortiums toimplement random testing? RSPA invites comments as to what methods mightbe used to facilitate inclusion of small entities in the program and whetherall small entities should be required to develop and implement a drug abatementprogram. Should the rule permit operators, especially the small ones, touse a third party to set up and maintain their drug testing program? Theycould choose to comply with the rule through the use of several options,including:(1) Form consortiums made up of owner operators that would develop a centrallyadministered random testing program.(2) Form consortiums, and hire a contractor to develop and implement arandom testing program.(3) Contract separately with an outside company that would set-up and providethese services.(4) Have existing industry-related groups (e.g., trade associations) set-updrug programs in which small entities could participate.(5) Arrange to be included as a part of a larger company's drug testingprogram.4. <T3>Testing based on reasonable cause </T3>would arise from either of twocircumstances. The first is involvement in the commission of serious orrepetitive errors in the job environment which fall short of accidents,but could lead to an accident and are reasonably likely to be linked todrug use. Because of the subjectivity of the criteria, at least two ofthe employee's supervisory personnel would have to concur that there isreasonable cause to believe that an error or errors have been committed,that drug use is indicated, and that the employee should be tested.Second, reasonable cause testing could be initiated on the basis of a beliefthat an individual is using or is under the influence of a prohibited drugwhile on duty. Changes in character or behavior may be symptomatic of druguse. Such changes are often characterized by mood swings and changes inappearance, attitude, speech, and work habits. Because of the subjectivityof the criteria, at least two of the employee's supervisory personnel wouldhave to concur that there is reasonable cause to believe that drug useexists and that the employee should be tested. RSPA does not seek to havethis type of testing used to harass an employee. Therefore, commentersshould address how to protect a disfavored employee from potential harassmentthrough drug testing. Should there be a limit to the number of times anemployee can be subjected to reasonable cause testing, in order to preventunwarranted harassment? With respect to this type of reasonable cause forsmall operators, it may not be possible to require two supervisors. Commentis requested concerning possible exemptions for small operators from partor all of reasonable cause drug testing. Commenters also should presentany data on the effectiveness of any existing programs that they are awareof which use reasonable cause or suspicion-type testing.<ITAG tagnum="84">Employee Assistance Program (EAP)</ITAG>An employee assistance program under the proposed rule would have threecomponents_rehabilitation, education, and training.<T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program</T3>The proposed rule would require under three of the proposed options, thatthe responsible party provide access to an EAP Rehabilitation Program forcertain employees who are not considered to be temporary employees underthe proposed rule.The operator may establish the EAP as a part of its internal personnelservices or the employer may make arrangements with an outside entity toprovide EAP services to an employee. The employer is not required to payfor the EAP Rehabilitation Program. Commenters should address: Who shouldbe afforded EAP services and under what circumstances? What is the estimatedlevel of voluntary enrollment in EAP services at sampling rates of 125percent and at 12.5 percent under each rehabilitation option?We believe that there may be some employees in the industry whose normalperiod of employment is too short to make it practical to require rehabilitationand reemployment. For example, even if a short-term hire tested positivefor drugs, the end of the scheduled employment term might come before thecompletion of a rehabilitation program. Therefore, we do not propose torequire employers to offer an opportunity for rehabilitation to temporaryemployees who are hired for a period of less than 90 days. That is, ifsuch employees test positive, they could be dismissed immediately.However, we recognize that some employees hired on a ``temporary'' basisare actually reemployed. Some of these employees are recurring seasonalhires, others are continually reemployed at the end of each specified term.These persons are regular members of the industry, and thus should notbe excluded from the opportunity for rehabilitation and reemployment. Underthe proposal, an employee would not be considered temporary for the purposesof rehabilitation, if he or she is eligible for reemployment by the sameemployer within 90 days following the end of the employment term. We specificallyrequest comments on (1) the merits of excluding temporary employees fromthe opportunity for rehabilitation, and (2) the definition of temporaryemployee.<T3>EAP Education Program</T3>Under the proposed rule an EAP education program would be required to include,at a minimum, the display and distribution of informational material onthe nature and effects of drugs, and the operator's policy regarding drugsand drug use in the workplace.<T3>EAP Training Program</T3>Under the proposed rule each operator would be required to conduct an EAPtraining program annually for all employees. The training program wouldbe required to include at least the following elements: the effects andconsequences of drug and alcohol use on personal health, safety, and workenvironment; the manifestations and behavioral cues that may indicate drugor alcohol use, and abuse; and documentation of training given to employeesand to the operator's supervisory personnel. EAP training programs foremployees and supervisory personnel would consist of at least 60 consecutiveminutes for each employee and supervisor each year. Is 60 minutes appropriate,or is some other period justified? Should RSPA specify the minimum trainingtime required? Once all employees have received training, should the annualtraining requirement apply only to supervisors and to new employees?Rehabilitation Options The NPRM proposes four different options concerning the circumstances underwhich employees would be given an opportunity to seek rehabilitation. Underthe first option, an employee who comes forward voluntarily or tests positivefor drugs for the first time would be eligible for rehabilitation ratherthan be discharged. Once rehabilitated, the employee could be reinstatedinto his or her prior position. The second option would give rehabilitationrights to employees who come forward voluntarily or who are identifiedas drug users during random tests, but would not require that the sameopportunity be afforded drug users identified in post-accident or reasonablecause tests; those not afforded the right to rehabilitation could be discharged.In the third option, only volunteers could claim rehabilitation rights.Anyone testing positive for drugs could be fired immediately. Under thefourth option, rehabilitation would not be mandated. The operator wouldbe able to decide what its policy regarding rehabilitation would be. Inall cases, of course, employers would be free to offer more rehabilitationoptions than the minimums we propose. Thus, for example, an employer couldvoluntarily offer two chances at rehabilitation rather than one. On theother hand, the proposed rule does not require the employer to offer anopportunity for rehabilitation to a repeat offender, to persons not currentlyemployed by the employer who fail a preemployment test, to persons whohave been found to use illicit drugs on the job, or to persons who refuseto take a required drug test. Each of these approaches has its own merits. For example, the broad rehabilitationprogram that would be provided by the first option is likely to maximizethe benefits to society, by ensuring that more drug users will get thehelp they need. If users are simply fired, they may lose access to, andperhaps incentive to use, rehabilitation services, and they will continueto be drug users. However, it could be argued that employees who are foundto be drug users through post-accident or reasonable cause tests are lessdeserving of an opportunity for rehabilitation. Unlike reasonable causeor post-accident testing, random testing is not triggered by an event thatprovides a particularized basis for inquiry as to the fitness of a givenemployee. Further, it is not accompanied by blood testing or a blood testoption, an investigation technique that can yield information more specificto current fitness. Therefore, there may be good reason to offer abatementor rehabilitation only to employees whose drug use is identified by self-referralor random testing. The third alternative is to require no program of rehabilitationand abatement following a positive test. This alternative is likely tobe lower in direct costs, because rehabilitation would only be requiredfor employees who seek it voluntarily, but for the same reason this alternativemight produce less in societal benefits. Finally, not mandating rehabilitationmay provide the most flexibility to labor and management to determine theneed for and shape of any rehabilitation program. It also could providedeterrence to drug use and thus may yield large benefits with low costs.Commenters should address whether this alternative would be effective forthe pipeline industry. How would this alternative affect the deterrencevalue of the proposal? What impact would it have on the costs and benefits?Would not requiring rehabilitation foster other approaches to combatingdrug usage. What are the estimated costs of individual EAP rehabilitation servicesunder each rehabilitation option? To what extent would each of the fouralternatives raise or lower costs and benefits? Is it reasonable to assumethat more drug users would self-identify under Options 3 and 4 than undereither of the other two options? Are the costs of required rehabilitationprograms warranted by the reduction in societal costs resulting from drugabuse? Which of these or other alternatives offers the greatest benefitsat the lowest cost? We are especially interested in comments on how toimplement opportunities for rehabilitation among smaller operators. Individuals who successfully complete an EAP Rehabilitation Program andwish to be retained in sensitive safety and security-related positionswould be required to, at a minimum, have two unannounced drug tests inthe twelve months following the completion of an EAP. The specific timeof the test would be left to the discretion of the operator. However, thetime period between the positive drug test event before entrance into anEAP and the first post-EAP test would be required to be sufficient to ensurethat the post-EAP test was not identifying the drug use incident previouslyidentified. Failure to comply with post-EAP drug testing would be causefor termination. <ITAG tagnum="84">Privacy</ITAG>We specifically request public comment on what, if any, procedures andsafeguards we should prescribe to assure adequate protection of the privacyof the persons being tested. We are particularly concerned with the circumstancesunder which test results would be given to persons other than the employerand the employee. For example, should test results be submitted to a prospectivefuture employer? If so, there would appear to be several ways in whichsuch data could reach the future employer. The data could be given at therequest of the future employer, at the discretion of the employer conductingthe test, or at the request of the employee. A subsequent employer couldrequire that an applicant either disclose prior drug test results or givethe employer permission to obtain prior drug tests results as a conditionof employment. Another option we are considering is authorizing the releaseof test results to future employers only in specified circumstances, suchas cases where the employee had been discharged for refusing to undergorehabilitation or had failed a second test after rehabilitation. In additionto future employers, other individuals may want access to the results ofdrug tests conducted under this rule. RSPA could prohibit access to testresults by the general public, including the news media. Moreover, othergovernment agencies may want the data for statistical, regulatory, or lawenforcement purposes. We request comments on whether we can and shouldprohibit access to the results of the drug program to individuals otherthan the employer and the employee. The potential for release of data may also complicate the issue of an employee'sright to contest the results of a test. A urine sample that had been subjectto tampering could unjustly end an employee's career even with anotheremployer, and it might be necessary to permit the employee to challengethe integrity of the test procedure. We invite comments on what proceduresshould be adopted and whether the types of procedures afforded an employeeshould vary, depending upon the consequences of a positive test. We would also like interested persons to discuss whether any final rulebased on those proposals should treat the privacy issue of pre-employmenttests differently from random or reasonable cause tests. Should we mandatethe destruction of the results of pre-employment tests for persons nothired? If not, what access should be allowed to them? <ITAG tagnum="84">Recordkeeping </ITAG>Related to the issue of privacy is the issue of what records should bekept. The proposed rule would require that each operator maintain a recordconcerning the results of its drug testing program. This record would summarizeand coordinate information on the following topics for each type of testingrequired: 1. The functions performed by the employees tested; 2. the prohibiteddrugs that were used by employees; 3. the ultimate disposition in eachcase (e.g., rehabilitation, termination); 4. the age of each employee whotested positive for prohibited drugs; and 5. the number of employees tested.This raises privacy concerns. Should we distinguish between general statisticaldata (the total number of positive tests at a company in a month or year)and particularized data (name-specific data). Small operators who employfew individuals will have difficulty concealing the identity of individualstested under the proposed drug program. Since small operators will havefewer individuals to test in any given time period, even seemingly neutralstatistical data would result in identification of an individual employeewho was dismissed as a result of a confirmed positive test result. Thispotential problem may be exacerbated if we require that only a small percentageof employees be tested each year. The proposed rule would require that the operator or an entity contractingwith the operator, permit RSPA and State Pipeline Safety Representativesto have access to the record. We request comments on what type of recordsshould be kept, including whether records should be kept of the numberof times an employee has been tested and found negative for drugs. Thiswould enable operators to evaluate the effectiveness of their programsand to make appropriate modifications. Should employers keep records ofpre-employment positive tests? If records are to be kept, for how longshould they be retained?<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Impact</ITAG>Economic Summary RSPA has prepared a Draft Evaluation of the economic impact of this proposal,which is available for review in the docket. The following is a summaryof the preliminary industry cost impact and benefit evaluation for theproposed rules to require pipeline operators to have a drug program foremployees who perform sensitive safety and security-related functions.RSPA has analyzed the first three alternatives concerning rehabilitationfor costs and benefits using 125 percent and 12.5 percent annual samplingrates for random testing. Under the first option, an employee who comesforward voluntarily or tests positive for illicit drug use for the firsttime would be eligible for rehabilitation. The second option would affordrehabilitation rights to employees identified as illicit drug users duringrandom tests, but would not require employers to afford the same opportunityto drug users identified in post-accident or reasonable cause tests. Underthe third option, only volunteers who self identify would be afforded rehabilitationrights. RSPA has estimated that first year costs associated with the drugprogram would range from a low of $3.5 million under the third option ata 12.5 percent sampling rate to a high of $31.5 million under the thirdoption at a 125 percent sampling rate. As shown in a June 1984 U.S. Department of Health and Human Services reportentitled ``Economic Costs to Society of Alcohol and Drug Abuse and MentalIllness: 1980'', the economic cost to society at large from drug abuseis estimated to be $66 billion annually. The 1988 GAO Report cited a Research Triangle Institute study, ``EconomicCosts to Society of Alcohol and Drug Abuse and Mental Illness'', whichestimated that the economic cost of drug abuse to the United States during1983 was $59.7 billion. This study, prepared for the Alcohol, Drug Abuseand Mental Health Administration (ADAMHA), estimated ``the costs of drugabuse to society for crime . . ., reduced productivity, treatment, andother items. The estimate did not include items such as social costs (e.g.,family conflict, suicide) and the value of the illicit drugs consumed.''A copy of the GAO report has been placed in the docket. As RSPA obtainsother data on drug use, it will place that date in the docket. The estimated 116,500 employees in the pipeline industry covered by theseproposals represent approximately .05 percent of the United States populationof 236,000,000. Thus, if these proposals induce current drug users in thepipeline industry to abandon drug use, RSPA estimates that there wouldbe a savings to society of $33 million. Furthermore, RSPA has determined that the maximum annual benefit of preventingpipeline accidents due to human error (including drug abuse) would be $24.9million. RSPA specifically invites comment on its Draft Evaluation, includingits analysis of annual costs and benefits. Commenters should be aware thatother operating administrations within the Department of Transportationalso are proposing drug testing programs. Elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register </T4>are NPRMs issued by the Urban Mass TransportationAdministration and the Coast Guard. In addition, the Federal Aviation Administrationpublished an NPRM in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on March 14, 1988 (53 FR 8368); the Federal RailroadAdministration's NPRM was published on May 10, 1988 (53 FR 16640); andthe Federal Highway Administration published its NPRM on June 14, 1988(53 FR 22268). Each of these rulemakings addresses the costs and benefitsof the proposals and are generally consistent with one another. In someinstances, however, and generally as a result of differences in the industriesaffected, the assumptions differ from those discussed in this proposedrulemaking. Obviously, changes in assumptions could affect the costs andbenefits. Because of the nature of some industries, costs for similar elementsalso may vary or could vary enough to warrant sensitivity analyses. Otherchanges in assumptions, such as test costs or rehabilitation costs, alsocan have an effect on the analysis. Commenters may find it helpful to reviewthe notices of proposed rulemaking or the economic analyses prepared bythe other operating administrations. Comparisons may aid commenters inreviewing data on this proposal and in formulating comments. In reviewingthe economic analysis and the basic assumptions made, commenters shouldaddress specific areas where there agree or disagree with the assumptionsand the basis for the comment. Commenters are directed to the other rulemakingsand their assumptions as a source of information in submitting comments.A copy of each of the documents has been placed in the docket.Regulatory Flexibility Determination These proposed rules would apply to all entities subject to RSPA's jurisdictionunder Parts 192, 193 or 195, other than operators of master meter systems.Operators or master meter systems constitute the bulk of small businessesor other small entities that operate gas pipeline systems. There are few,if any, small entities that operate hazardous liguid pipeline subject toPart 195 or liquefied natural gas facilities that are subject to Part 193.Therefore, I certify that pursuant to Section 605 of the Regulatory FlexibilityAct, these proposed rules will not, if adopted as final have a ``significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities.''Paperwork Reduction Act The proposed rules would require, under 49 CFR 192.605, 193.2711, and 195.402that the operator develop plans and maintain records on its drug testingprogram, and provide RSPA and State pipeline officials with access to thoseplans and records. In accordance with the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980(P.L. 96-511), these information collection requirements will be submittedto the Office of Management and Budget for approval. Persons desiring tocomment on these information collection requirements should submit theircomments to: Office of Regulatory Policy, Office of Management and Budget,726 Jackson Place, NW., Washington, DC 20503; Attention: RSPA Desk Officer.A copy of these comments should also be submitted to the RSPA Docket asindicated above under <T2>``ADDRESS.''</T2>Federalism Implications RSPA has reviewed the proposals in this Notice in light of the Federalismconsiderations set forth in Executive Order 12612. Although the proposalsrelate to requirements that would have to be adopted by States participatingin the Federal-State relationships prescribed in the NGPSA and the HLPSA,the impact of those requirements based upon currently available informationwould not be substantial. In addition, RSPA does not expect that thoserequirements would have a substantial direct effect on the relationshipbetween the national government and the States or on the distribution ofpower and responsibilities among the various levels of government. Accordingly,preparation of a Federalism Assessment under Executive Order 12612 is notwarranted.Significance These proposed regulations are considered to be non-major under ExecutiveOrder 12291. However, they are significant under Department of TransportationRegulatory Policies and Procedures (44 FR 11034, February 26, 1979) becausethey concern a matter on which there is substantial public interest.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>49 CFR Part 192 Pipeline safety, Operation, Maintenance, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.49 CFR Part 193 LNG facility, Operation, Maintenance, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.49 CFR Part 195 Pipeline safety, Hazardous liquids, Operation, Maintenance, Reporting andrecordkeeping requirements.<ITAG tagnum="84">Request for Public Comment </ITAG>RSPA proposes to amend Parts 192, 193, and 195 of Title 49, Code of FederalRegulations, as set forth below. RSPA solicits comments on all aspectsof the proposed rule and the data and analysis advanced in explanationof the proposed rules, whether through written submissions, or participationat the public hearings, or both. RSPA may make changes in the final rulebased on comments received in response to this notice.<ITAG tagnum="21">Issued in Washington, DC on June 29, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">M. Cynthia Douglass,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 192_[AMENDED] </ITAG>In consideration of the foregoing, RSPA proposes to amend 49 CFR Part 192as follows: 1. The authority citation for Part 192 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 App. U.S.C. 1671 and 1804; and 49 CFR 1.53.</ITAG>2. Section 192.603 would be amended by adding a new paragraph (c) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 192.603</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General provisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) No operator may knowingly allow the performance of any function specifiedin Part II of Appendix E to this part by any individual who:  (1) Fails a drug test as defined in Appendix E, and fails to successfullycomplete rehabilitation as defined in Appendix E, Section VII, (2) Refuses to take a drug test required under Appendix E by the operator'sdrug testing program, or (3) Has a prohibited drug in his or her system. 3. Section 192.605 would be amended by adding new a paragraph (f) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 192.605</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Essentials of operating and maintenance plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(f) A drug testing program meeting the requirements prescribed in AppendixE to this part, except that an operator of a master meter system, as definedby 49 CFR 191.3 of this subchapter, is not required to have such a programfor that system. 4. A new Appendix E would be added at the end of Part 192:<ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix E_Drug Testing Program </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This appendix contains the standards for, and components of, a drugtesting program required by this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">I. Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the purposes of this appendix: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Accident'' means an incident as defined in 49 CFR 191.3. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Employee'' is a person who performs either directly or by contract,a function listed in section II of this appendix for a pipeline operator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Failing a drug test'' means that the confirmation test result showspositive evidence of the presence of a prohibited drug in an employee'ssystem. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``HHS Guidelines'' Drug testing programs subject to the requirementsof this Part shall be operated consistent with the ``Scientific and TechnicalGuidelines for Federal Drug Testing Programs and Standards for Certificationof Laboratories Engaged in Urine Drug Testing for Federal Agencies'' publishedby the Department of Health and Human Services (53 FR 11970, April 11,1988). Drug testing programs governed by the requirements of this Partshall use only drug testing laboratories certified by the Department ofHealth and Human Services under the guidelines. These guidelines are availablefor inspection and copying at RSPA, Department of Transportation, 400 SeventhStreet, SW., Washington, DC 20590, Room 8417. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Passing a drug test'' means that initial testing or confirmationtesting does not show evidence of the presence of a prohibited drug inan employee's system at levels above those prescribed in section III ofthis appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Prohibited drug'' means a substance specified in Schedule I or ScheduleII of the Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. 801.812 (1981 andamp; 1987Cum.P.P.), unless the drug is being used as authorized by, and in accordancewith, a legal prescription or exemption under Federal, State, or locallaw.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">II. Employees Who Must be Tested </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Employees who performs for an operator sensitive safety and security-relatedfunctions must be tested pursuant to the operator's drug testing program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">III. Substances for Which Testing Must be Conducted </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each operator shall test a specimen from each employee who performa function listed in section II of this appendix for evidence of marijuana,cocaine, opiates, amphetamines, and phencyclidine (PCP) during each testrequired by section IV of this appendix in conformity with the HHS Guidelines.An operator may test for any prohibited drug in conformity with the HHSGuidelines in a post-accident or reasonable cause test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">IV. Types of Drug Testing Required </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each operator shall conduct the following types of testing: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Pre-employment testing. </T3>No operator may hire, or, in the caseof a person who is hired by a contractor, allow the use of, any personto perform a function listed in section II of this appendix unless theapplicant passes an initial test or confirmation test specified in theHHS Guidelines. If an initial test is positive, confirmation testing asspecified in the HHS Guidelines must be done. The operator shall advisean applicant that pre-employment testing will be conducted to determinethe presence of any prohibited drug in the applicant's system. If the applicantfails the confirmation test, the applicant shall not be hired. The applicantmay withdraw his or her application for employment and the operator shallnot disclose the failure or the results of a failed test to any person.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Post-accident testing. </T3>Each operator shall test a specimen collectedfrom each employee who performs a function listed in section II of thisappendix and whose performance of that function is directly related toan accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Random testing. </T3>Each operator annually shall collect a specimenfrom, and test randomly, up to 125 percent of all employees who performa function listed in section II of this appendix. The operator shall selectemployees for random testing using a random number table or a computer-basednumber generator which is matched with an employee's social security number,payroll identification number, or other appropriate identification number.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. <T3>Testing based on reasonable cause. </T3>Each operator shall test aspecimen collected from each employee who performs a function listed insection II of this appendix and who is involved in the commission of seriousor repetitive errors which could lead to an accident and which may be linkedto drug use. At least two of the employee's supervisors shall substantiateand concur in the determination that there is reasonable cause to believethat drug use is indicated in the commission of an error or errors, andthat the employee should be tested. In addition, if at least two of theemployee's supervisors substantiate and concur in the determination thatthere is reasonable cause to believe that the employee is using prohibiteddrugs, on the basis of physical indications of probable intoxication (e.g.,the employee's speech or physical appearance), the employer should testthe employee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">V. Specimen Collection and Testing Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each operator must conform to the HHS Guidelines during collection,and initial and confirmation testing of specimens. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">VI. Employee Assistance Program (EAP) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program_Option 1. </T3>1. Each operator shall provideaccess to one opportunity for rehabilitation for the following employees:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Each employee, who is not a temporary employee, and who voluntarilyenrolls in an EAP Rehabilitation Program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Each employee, who is not a temporary employee, who is referredto an EAP Rehabilitation Program as a result of receiving his or her firstpositive confirmation drug test result. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operator may establish an EAP Rehabilitation Program as partof its internal personnel services, or the employer may make arrangementswith an outside entity to provide services to an employee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The operator shall determine whether the operator or the employeewho requires treatment shall bear the cost of the EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Individuals covered by these rules who successfully complete anEAP Rehabilitation Program and wish to be retained in sensitive safetyand security-related positions, must, at a minimum, have two unannounceddrug tests in the twelve months following the completion of the EAP RehabilitationProgram. The specific time of the test is left to the discretion of theoperator. However, the time period between the positive drug test eventbefore entrance into an EAP Rehabilitation Program and the first post-EAPtest must be sufficient to ensure that the post-EAP test is not identifyingthe drug use incident previously identified. Failure to comply with post-EAPdrug testing is cause for termination. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program_Option 2. </T3>1. Each operator shall provideaccess to one opportunity for rehabilitation for the following employees:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Each employee, who is not a temporary employee, and who voluntarilyenrolls in an EAP Rehabilitation Program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Each employee, who is not a temporary employee, who, as a resultof a random drug test, is referred to an EAP Rehabilitation Program afterreceiving his or her first positive confirmation drug test result. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operator may establish an EAP Rehabilitation Program as partof its internal personnel services, or the employer may make arrangementswith an outside entity to provide services to an employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The operator shall determine whether the operator or the employeewho requires treatment shall bear the cost of the EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Individuals covered by these rules who successfully complete anEAP Rehabilitation Program and wish to be retained in sensitive safetyand security-related positions, must, at a minimum, have two unannounceddrug tests in the twelve months following the completion of the EAP RehabilitationProgram. The specific time of the test is left to the discretion of theoperator. However, the time period between the positive drug test eventbefore entrance into an EAP Rehabilitation Program and the first post-EAPtest must be sufficient to ensure that the post-EAP test is not identifyingthe drug use incident previously identified. Failure to comply with post-EAPdrug testing is cause for termination. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program_Option 3.</T3> 1. Each operator shall provideaccess to one opportunity for rehabilitation for the following employees:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each employee, who is not a temporary employee, and who voluntarilyenrolls in an EAP Rehabilitation Program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operator may establish an EAP Rehabilitation Program as partof its internal personnel services, or the employer may make arrangementswith an outside entity to provide services to an employee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The operator shall determine whether the operator or the employeewho requires treatment shall bear the cost of the EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Individuals covered by these rules who successfully complete anEAP Rehabilitation Program and wish to be retained in sensitive safetyand security-related positions, must, at a minimum, have two unannounceddrug tests in the twelve months following the completion of the EAP RehabilitationProgram. The specific time of the test is left to the discretion of theoperator. However, the time period between the positive drug test eventbefore entrance into an EAP Rehabilitation Program and the first post-EAPtest must be sufficient to ensure that the post-EAP test is not identifyingthe drug use incident previously identified. Failure to comply with post-EAPdrug testing is cause for termination. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program_Option 4.</T3> 1. Each operator shall determineits policy concerning whether rehabilitation will be offered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operator may establish an EAP Rehabilitation Program as partof its internal personnel services, or the employer may make arrangementswith an outside entity to provide services to an employee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Individuals who are offered an opportunity for rehabilitation providedvoluntarily by the operator, who successfully complete an EAP RehabilitationProgram and wish to be retained in sensitive safety and security-relatedpositions, must, at a minimum, have two unannounced drug tests in the twelvemonths following the completion of the EAP Rehabilitation Program. Thespecific time of the test is left to the discretion of the operator. However,the time period between the positive drug test event before entrance intoan EAP Rehabilitation Program and the first post-EAP test should be sufficientto ensure that the post-EAP test is not identifying the drug use incidentpreviously identified. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>EAP education program.</T3> Each EAP education program must include,at minimum, the display and distribution of informational material on thenature and effects of drugs, and the operator's policy regarding drugsand drug use in the workplace. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>EAP training program. </T3>Each EAP training program must be conductedannually for employees. The training program must include at least thefollowing elements: the effects and consequences of drug and alcohol useon personal health, safety, and work environment; the manifestations andbehavioral cues that may indicate drug or alcohol use and abuse; and documentationof training given to employees. EAP training programs for employees mustconsist of at least 60 consecutive minutes for each employee and supervisoreach year. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">VII. Action That May Be Taken by an Operator </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">An operator may not discipline or terminate an employee for drug-relatedcauses, who is not a temporary employee, if the employee successfully completesrehabilitation and receives a recommendation for return to duty by therehabilitation program director. However, the employee must be temporarilymoved from his or her position until rehabilitation is successfully completed,and the required recommendation is obtained from the rehabilitation programdirector. An operator is not required to offer rehabilitation to an employeewho refuses a required drug test or to one who has been found to use aprohibited drug while on the job. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">VIII. Operator's Drug Testing Plan </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. Each operator shall include a drug testing plan, which conformsto this Appendix and to the HHS Guidelines, in its operating and maintenanceplan by 120 days after the effective date of this rule. The drug testingplan must be implemented within 180 days after the plan is incorporatedin the operating and maintenance plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The plan must provide the name and address of the laboratory whichhas been selected by the operator for analysis of the specimens collectedduring the drug testing program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. With respect to those employees who are hired by a contractor toperform functions for the operator specified in section II of this appendixpursuant to a contract with the operator, the operator may provide by contractthat the testing, training and rehabilitation required by its drug testingplan be carried out by the contractor provided that: (1) The operator remainsresponsible for ensuring that the terms of its drug testing plan are compliedwith, (2) the operator remains responsible for ensuring that an employeewho fails the testing does not perform any functions specified in sectionII until successful rehabilitation has taken place, and (3) the contractorshall allow access to property and records by the operator, by State PipelineSafety Representatives, and by RSPA for the purpose of monitoring the operator'scompliance with the requirements of this appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">IX. Recording Results of Drug Testing Program </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each operator shall maintain a record of the results of its drug testingprogram. Each operator shall permit duly authorized RSPA and State PipelineSafety Representatives to have access to the record. The record shall includethe following information categorized by method of testing: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The functions performed by the employees who tested positive forprohibited drug. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The prohibited drugs which were used by the employees. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The disposition of employees who failed the test (e.g., termination,rehabilitation, leave without pay). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. The age of each employee who failed a drug test. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. The number of employees tested.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 193_[AMENDED]</ITAG>In consideration of the foregoing, RSPA proposes to amend 49 CFR Part 193as follows:1. The authority citation for Part 193 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 App. U.S.C. 1671 <T3>et seq</T3>.; and 49 CFR 1.53.</ITAG>2. Section 193.2707 would be amended by adding a new paragraph (d) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 193.2707</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operations and maintenance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) No operator may knowingly allow the performance of any function specifiedin Part II of Appendix B to this part by any individual who:(1) Fails a drug test as defined in Appendix B, and fails to successfullycomplete rehabilitation as defined in Appendix B Section VII,(2) Refuses to take a drug test required under Appendix B by the operator'sdrug testing program, or(3) Has a prohibited drug in his or her <T3>system.</T3>3. Section 193.2711 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 193.2711</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Personnel health.</ITAG>Each operator shall follow a written plan to verify that personnel assignedoperating, maintenance, security, or fire protection duties at the LNGplant do not have any physical condition that would impair performanceof their assigned duties. The plan must be designed to detect both readilyobservable disorders, such as physical handicaps or injury, and conditionsrequiring professional examination for discovery. The plan must also includea drug testing program meeting the requirements prescribed in AppendixB to this part.4. Appendix B would be added at the end of Part 193:<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix B_Drug Testing Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This appendix contains the standards for, and components of, a drugtesting program required by this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">I. Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the purposes of this appendix:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Accident'' means an incident as defined in 49 CFR 191.3.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Employee'' is a person who performs either directly or by contract,a function listed in section II of this appendix for a pipeline operator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Failing a drug test'' means that the confirmation test results showspositive evidence of the presence of a prohibited drug in an employee'ssystem.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``HHS Guidelines''. Drug testing programs subject to the requirementsof this Part shall be operated consistent with the ``Scientific and TechnicalGuidelines for Federal Drug Testing Programs and Standards for Certificationof Laboratories Engaged in Urine Drug Testing for Federal Agencies'' publishedby the Department of Health and Human Services (53 FR 11970, April 11,1988). Drug testing programs governed by the requirements of this Partshall use only drug testing laboratories certified by the Department ofHealth and Human Services under the guidelines. These guidelines are availablefor inspection and copying at RSPA, Department of Transportation, 400 SeventhStreet, SW., Washington, DC 20590, Room 8417.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Operator'' is a pipeline operator who is subject to the NGPSA orthe HLPSA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Passing a drug test'' means that initial testing or confirmationtesting does not show evidence of the presence of a prohibited drug inan employee's system at levels above those prescribed in the HHS Guidelines.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Prohibited drug'' means a substance specified in Schedule I or ScheduleII of the Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. 801.812 (1981 andamp; 1987Cum.P.P.), unless the drug is being used as authorized by, and in accordancewith, a legal prescription or exemption under Federal, state, or locallaw.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">II. Employees Who Must Be Tested.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Employees who perform sensitive safety and security-related functionsfor an operator involving the operating or maintaining of an LNG facilitymust be tested pursuant to the operator's drug testing program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">III. Substances for Which Testing Must be Conducted</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each operator shall test a specimen from each employee who performsa function listed in section II of this appendix for evidence of marijuana,cocaine, opiates, amphetamines, and phencyclidine (PCP) during each testrequired by section IV of this appendix in conformity with the HHS Guidelines.An operator may also test for any other prohibited drug in conformity withthe HHS Guidelines during a post-accident or reasonable cause test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">IV. Types of Drug Testing Required</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each operator shall conduct the following types of testing:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Pre-employment testing. </T3>No operator may hire, or, in the caseof a person who is hired by a contractor, allow the use of, any personto perform a function listed in section II of this appendix unless theapplicant passes an initial test or confirmation test specified in theHHS guidelines. If an initial test is positive, confirmation testing asspecified in the HHS Guidelines must be done. The operator shall advisean applicant that pre-employment testing will be conducted to determinethe presence of any prohibited drug in the applicant's system. If the applicantfails the confirmation test, the applicant shall not be hired. The applicantmay withdraw his or her application for employment and the operator shallnot disclose the failure or the results of a failed test to any person.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Post-accident testing. </T3>Each operator shall test a specimen collectedfrom each employee who performs a function listed in section II of thisappendix and whose performance of that function is directly related toan accident.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Random testing. </T3>Each operator annually shall collect a specimenfrom, and test randomly, up to 125 percent of all employees who performa function listed in section II of this appendix. The operator shall selectemployees for random testing using a random number table or a computer-basednumber generator which is matched with an employee's social security number,payroll identification number, or other appropriate identification number.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. <T3>Testing based on reasonable cause. </T3>Each operator shall test aspecimen collected from each employee who performs a function listed insection II of this appendix and who is involved in the commission of seriousor repetitive errors which could lead to an accident and which may be linkedto drug use. At least two of the employee's supervisors shall substantiateand concur in the determination that there is reasonable cause to believethat drug use is indicated in the commission of an error or errors, andthat the employee should be tested. In addition, if at least two of theemployee's supervisors substantiate and concur in the determination thatthere is reasonable cause to believe that the employee is using prohibiteddrugs, on the basis of physical indications of probable intoxication (e.g.,the employee's speech or physical appearance), the employer should testthe employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">V. Specimen Collection and Testing Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each operator must conform to the HHS Guidelines during collection,and initial and confirmation testing of specimens.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">VI. Employee Assistance Program (EAP)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program_Option 1. </T3>1. Each operator shall provideaccess to one opportunity for rehabilitation for the following employees:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Each employee, who is not a temporary employee, and who voluntarilyenrolls in an EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Each employee who is not a temporary employee and who is referredto an EAP Rehabilitation Program as a result of receiving his or her firstpositive confirmation drug test result.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operator may establish an EAP Rehabilitation Program as partof its internal personnel services, or the employer may make arrangementswith an outside entity to provide services to an employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The operator shall determine whether the operator or the employeewho requires treatment shall bear the cost of the EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Individuals covered by these rules who successfully complete anEAP Rehabilitation Program and wish to be retained in sensitive safetyand security-related positions, must, at a minimum, have two unannounceddrug tests in the twelve months following the completion of the EAP RehabilitationProgram. The specific time of the test is left to the discretion of theoperator. However, the time period between the positive drug test eventbefore entrance into an EAP Rehabilitation Program and the first post-EAPtest must be sufficient to ensure that the post-EAP test is not identifyingthe drug use incident previously identified. Failure to comply with post-EAPdrug testing is cause for termination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program_Option 2. </T3>1. Each operator shall provideaccess to one opportunity for rehabilitation for the following employees:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Each employee, who is not a temporary employee, and who voluntarilyenrolls in an EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Each employee who is not a temporary employee and who, as a resultof a random drug test, is referred to an EAP Rehabilitation Program afterreceiving his or her first positive confirmation drug test result.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operator may establish an EAP Rehabilitation Program as partof its internal personnel services, or the employer may make arrangementswith an outside entity to provide services to an employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The operator shall determine whether the operator or the employeewho requires treatment shall bear the cost of the EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Individuals covered by these rules who successfully complete anEAP Rehabilitation Program and wish to be retained in sensitive safetyand security-related positions, must, at a minimum, have two unannounceddrug tests in the twelve months following the completion of the EAP RehabilitationProgram. The specific time of the test is left to the discretion of theoperator. However, the time period between the positive drug test eventbefore entrance into an EAP Rehabilitation Program and the first post-EAPtest must be sufficient to ensure that the post-EAP test is not identifyingthe drug use incident previously identified. Failure to comply with post-EAPdrug testing is cause for termination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program_Option 3. </T3>1. Each operator shall provideaccess to one opportunity for rehabilitation for the following employees:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each employee, who is not a temporary employee, and who voluntarilyenrolls in an EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operator may establish an EAP Rehabilitation Program as partof its internal personnel services, or the employer may make arrangementswith an outside entity to provide services to an employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The operator shall determine whether the operator or the employeewho requires treatment shall bear the cost of the EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Individuals covered by these rules who successfully complete anEAP Rehabilitation Program and wish to be retained in sensitive safetyand security-related positions, must, at a minimum, have two unannounceddrug tests in the twelve months following the completion of the EAP RehabilitationProgram. The specific time of the test is left to the discretion of theoperator. However, the time period between the positive drug test eventbefore entrance into an EAP Rehabilitation Program and the first post-EAPtest must be sufficient to ensure that the post-EAP test is not identifyingthe drug use incident previously identified. Failure to comply with post-EAPdrug testing is cause for termination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program_Option 4. </T3>1. Each operator shall determineits policy concerning whether rehabilitation will be offered.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operator may establish an EAP Rehabilitation Program as partof its internal personnel services, or the employer may make arrangementswith an outside entity to provide services to an employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Individuals who are offered an opportunity for rehabilitation providedvoluntarily by the operator, who successfully complete an EAP RehabilitationProgram and wish to be retained in sensitive safety and security-relatedpositions, must, at a minimum, have two unannounced drug tests in the twelvemonths following the completion of the EAP Rehabilitation Program. Thespecific time of the test is left to the discretion of the operator. However,the time period between the positive drug test event before entrance intoan EAP Rehabilitation Program and the first post-EAP test should be sufficientto ensure that the post-EAP test is not identifying the drug use incidentpreviously identified.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>EAP education program. </T3>Each EAP education program must includeat minimum, the display and distribution of informational material on thenature and effects of drugs, and the operator's policy regarding drugsand drug use in the workplace.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>EAP training program. </T3>Each EAP training program must be conductedannually for employees. The training program must include at least thefollowing elements: the effects and consequences of drug and alcohol useon personal health, safety, and work environment; the manifestations andbehavioral cues that may indicate drug or alcohol use and abuse; and documentationof training given to employees. EAP training programs for employees mustconsist of at least 60 consecutive minutes for each employee each year.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">VII. Action That May Be Taken by an Operator</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">An operator may not discipline or terminate an employee for drug-relatedcauses, who is not a temporary employee, if the employee successfully completesrehabilitation and receives a recommendation for return to duty by therehabilitation program director. However, the employee must be temporarilymoved from his or her position until rehabilitation is successfully completed,and the requried recommendation is obtained from the rehabilitation programdirector. An operator is not required to offer rehabilitation to an employeewho refuses a required drug test or to one who has been found to use aprohibited drug while on the job.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">VIII. Operator's Drug Testing Plan</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. Each operator shall develop and implement a drug testing plan,which conforms to this Appendix and the HHS Guidelines, and incorporateit into its Personnel Health Plan by 120 days after the effective dateof this rule. The drug testing plan must be implemented within 180 daysafter the plan is incorporated in its Personnel Health Plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The plan must provide the name and address of the laboratory whichhas been selected by the operator for analysis of the specimens collectedduring the drug testing program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. With respect to those employees who are hired by a contractor toperform functions for the operator specified in section II of this appendixpursuant to a contract with the operator, the operator may provide by contractthat the testing, training and rehabilitation required by its drug testingplan be carried out by the contractor provided that: (1) The operator remainsresponsible for ensuring that the terms of its drug testing plan are compliedwith, (2) the operator remains responsible for ensuring that an employeewho fails the testing does not perform any functions specified in sectionII until successful rehabilitation has taken place, and (3) the contractorshall allow access to property and records by the operator, by State PipelineSafety Representatives and by RSPA for the purpose of monitoring the operator'scompliance with the requirements of this appendix.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">IX. Recording Results of Drug Testing Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each operator shall maintain a record of the results of its drug testingprogram. Each operator shall permit duly authorized RSPA and State PipelineSafety Personnel to have access to the record. The record shall includethe following information categorized by method of testing:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The functions performed by the employees who tested positive forprohibited drug.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The prohibited drugs which were used by the employees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The disposition of employees who failed the test (e.g., termination,rehabilitation, leave without pay).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. The age of each employee who failed a drug test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. The number of employees tested.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 195_[AMENDED]</ITAG>In consideration of the foregoing, RSPA proposes to amend 49 CFR Part 195as follows:5. The authority citation for Part 195 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>40 App. U.S.C. 2002; and 49 CFR 1.53.</ITAG>6. Section 195.401 would be amended by adding a new paragraph (d) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 195.401</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) No operator may knowingly allow the performance of any function specifiedin Part II of Appendix B to this part by any individual who (1) fails adrug test as defined in Appendix B and fails to complete successful rehabilitationas decribed in Appendix B VII, (2) refuses to take a drug test requiredpursuant to Appendix B by the operator's drug testing program, or (3) hasa prohibited drug in his or her system.7. Section 195.402 would be amended by adding a new paragraph (c)(14) toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 195.402</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedural manual for operations, maintenance, and emergencies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) Maintenance and normal operations. * * *(14) Establishing and implementing a drug training program that meets therequirements of Appendix B to this part.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>8. A new Appendix B would be added at the end of Part 195:<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix B_Drug Testing Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">I. Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the purposes of this appendix, the following definitions apply:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Accident'' means a failure required to be reported in accordancewith Subpart B of this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Employee'' is a person who performs either directly or by contract,a function listed in section II of this appendix for a pipeline operator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Failing a drug test'' means that the confirmation test result showspositive evidence of the presence of a prohibited drug in an employee'ssystem.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``HHS Guidelines''. Drug testing programs subject to the requirementsof this Part shall be operated consistent with the ``Scientific and TechnicalGuidelines for Federal Drug Testing Programs and Standards for Certificationof Laboratories Engaged in Urine Drug Testing for Federal Agencies'' publishedby the Department of Health and Human Services (53 FR 11970, April 11,1988). Drug testing programs governed by the requirements of this Partshall use only drug testing laboratories certified by the Department ofHealth and Human Services under the guidelines. These guidelines are availablefor inspection and copying at RSPA, Department of Transportation, 400 SeventhStreet, SW., Washington DC 20590, Room 8417.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Operator'' is a pipeline operator who is subject to the NGPSA orthe HLPSA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Passing a drug test'' means that initial testing or confirmationtesting does not show evidence of the presence of a prohibited drug inan employee's system at levels above those prescribed in the HHS Guidelines.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Prohibited drug'' means a substance specified in Schedule I or ScheduleII of the Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. andSection; 801.812 (1981andamp; 1987 Cum. P.P.), unless the drug is being used as authorized by,and in accordance with, a legal prescription or exemption under Federal,state, or local law.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">II. Employees Who Must Be Tested</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Employees who perform for an operator sensitive safety and security-relatedfunctions must be tested pursuant to the operator's drug testing program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">III. Substances for Which Testing Must be Conducted</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each operator shall test a specimen from each employee who performsa function listed in section II of this appendix for evidence of marijuana,cocaine, opiates, amphetamines, and phencyclidine (PCP) during each testrequired by section IV of this appendix in conformity with the HHS Guidelines.An operator may test for any other prohibited drug in conformity with theHHS Guidelines in a post-accident or reasonable cause test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">IV. Types of Drug Testing Required</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each operator shall conduct the following types of testing:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Pre-employment testing.</T3> No operator may hire, or, in the caseof a person who is hired by a contractor, allow the use of, any personto perform a function listed in section II of this appendix unless theapplicant passes an initial test or confirmation test specified in theHHS guidelines. If an initial test is positive, confirmation testing asspecified in the HHS Guidelines must be done. The operator shall advisean applicant that pre-employment testing will be conducted to determinethe presence of any prohibited drug in the applicant's system. If the applicantfails the confirmation test, the applicant shall not be hired. The applicantmay withdraw his or her application for employment and the operator shallnot disclose the failure or the results of a failed test to any person.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Post-accident testing.</T3> Each operator shall test a specimen collectedfrom each employee who performs a function listed in section II of thisappendix and whose performance of that function is directly related toan accident.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Random testing.</T3> Each operator annually shall collect a specimenfrom, and test randomly, up to 125 percent of all employees who performa function listed in section II of this appendix. The operator shall selectemployees for random testing using a random number table or a computer-basednumber generator which is matched with an employee's social security number,payroll identification number, or other appropriate identification number.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. <T3>Testing based on reasonable cause.</T3> Each operator shall test aspecimen collected from each employee who performs a function listed insection II of this appendix and who is involved in the commission of seriousor repetitive errors which could lead to an accident and which may be linkedto drug use. At least two of the employee's supervisors shall substantiateand concur in the determination that there is reasonable cause to believethat drug use is indicated in the commission of an error or errors, andthat the employee should be tested. In addition, if a least two of theemployee's supervisors substantiate and concur in the determination thatthere is reasonable cause to believe that the employee is using drugs,on the basis of physical indications of probable intoxication (e.g., theemployee's speech or physical appearance), the employer should test theemployee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">V. Specimen Collection and Testing Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each operator must conform to the HHS Guidelines during collection,and initial and confirmation testing of specimens.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">VI. Employee Assistance Program (EAP)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program_Option 1.</T3> 1. Each operator shall provideaccess to one opportunity for rehabilitation for the following employees:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Each employee who is not a temporary employee and who voluntarilyenrolls in an EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Each employee who is not a temporary employee and who is referredto an EAP Rehabilitation Program as a result of receiving his or her firstpositive confirmation drug test result.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operator may establish an EAP Rehabilitation Program as partof its internal personnel services, or the employer may make arrangementswith an outside entity to provide services to an employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The operator shall determine whether the operator or the employeewho requires treatment shall bear the cost of the EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Individuals covered by these rules who successfully complete anEAP Rehabilitation Program and wish to be retained in sensitive safetyand security-related positions, must, at a minimum, have two unannounceddrug tests in the twelve months following the completion of the EAP RehabilitationProgram. The specific time of the test is left to the discretion of theoperator. However, the time period between the positive drug test eventbefore entrance into an EAP Rehabilitation Program and the first post-EAPtest must be sufficient to ensure that the post-EAP test is not identifyingthe drug use incident previously identified. Failure to comply with post-EAPdrug testing is cause for termination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program_Option 2. </T3>1. Each operator shall provideaccess to one opportunity for rehabilitation for the following employees:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Each employee who is not a temporary employee and who voluntarilyenrolls in an EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Each employee who is not a temporary employee and who, as a reusltof a random drug test, is referred to an EAP Rehabilitation Program afterreceiving his or her first positive confirmation drug test result.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operator may establish an EAP Rehabilitation Program as partof its internal personnel services, or the employer may make arrangementswith an outside entity to provide services to an employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The operator shall determine whether the operator or the employeewho requires treatment shall bear the cost of the EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Individuals covered by these rules who successfully complete anEAP Rehabilitation Program and wish to be retained in sensitive safetyand security-related positions, must, at a minimum, have two unannounceddrug tests in the twelve months following the completion of the EAP RehabilitationProgram. The specific time of the test is left to the discretion of theoperator. However, the time period between the positive drug test eventbefore entrance into an EAP Rehabilitation Program and the first post-EAPtest must be sufficient to ensure that the post-EAP test is not identifyingthe drug use incident previously identified. Failure to comply with post-EAPdrug testing is cause for termination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program_Option 3. </T3>1. Each operator shall provideaccess to one opportunity for rehabilitation for the following employees:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each employee who is not a temporary employee and who voluntarilyenrolls in an EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operator may establish an EAP Rehabilitation Program as partof its internal personnel services, or the employer may make arrangementswith an outside entity to provide services to an employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The operator shall determine whether the operator or the employeewho requires treatment shall bear the cost of the EAP Rehabilitation Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Individuals covered by these rules who successfully complete anEAP Rehabilitation Program and wish to be retained in sensitive safetyand security-related positions, must, at a minimum, have two unannounceddrug tests in the twelve months following the completion of the EAP RehabilitationProgram. The specific time of the test is left to the discretion of theoperator. However, the time period between the positive drug test eventbefore entrance into an EAP Rehabilitation Program and the first post-EAPtest must be sufficient to ensure that the post-EAP test is not identifyingthe drug use incident previously identified. Failure to comply with post-EAPdrug testing is cause for termination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>EAP Rehabilitation Program_Option 4. </T3>1. Each operator shall determineits policy concerning whether rehabilitation will be offered.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operator may establish an EAP Rehabilitation Program as partof its internal personnel services, or the employer may make arrangementswith an outside entity to provide services to an employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Individuals who are offered an opportunity for rehabilitation providedvoluntarily by the operator, who successfully complete and EAP RehabilitationProgram and wish to be retained in sensitive safety and security-relatedpositions, must, at a minimum, have two unannounced drug tests in the twelvemonths following the completion of the EAP Rehabilitation Program. Thespecific time of the test is left to the discretion of the operator. However,the time period between the positive drug test event before entrance intoan EAP Rehabilitation Program and the first post-EAP test should be sufficientto ensure that the post-EAP test is not identifying the drug use incidentpreviously identified.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>EAP education program. </T3>Each EAP education program must include,at minimum, the display and distribution of informational material on thenature and effects of drugs, and the operator's policy regarding drugsand drug use in the workplace.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>EAP training program. </T3>Each EAP training program must be conductedannually for employees. The training program must include at least thefollowing elements: the effects and consequences of drug and alcohol useon personal health, safety, and work environment; the manifestations andbehavioral cues that may indicate drug or alcohol use and abuse; and documentationof training given to employees. EAP training programs for employees mustconsist of at least 60 consecutive minutes for each employee each year.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">VII. Action That May Be Taken by an Operator</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">An operator may not discipline or terminate an employee for drug-relatedcauses, who is not a temporary employee, if the employee successfully completesrehabilitation and receives a recommendation for return to duty by therehabilitation program director. However, the employee must be temporarilymoved from his or her position until rehabilitation is successfully completed,and the required recommendation is obtained from the rehabilitation programdirector. An operator is not required to offer rehabilitation to an employeewho refuses to take a required drug test or to one who has been found touse a prohibited drug while on the job.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">VIII. Operator's Drug Testing Plan</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. Each operator shall include a drug testing plan, which conformsto this Appendix and the HHS Guidelines, in its operating and maintenanceplan by 120 days after the effective date of this rule. The drug testingplan must be implemented within 180 days after the incorporation of theplan in the operating and maintenance plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The plan must provide the name and address of the laboratory whichhas been selected by the operator for analysis of the specimens collectedduring the drug testing program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. With respect to those employees who are hired by a contractor toperfrom functions for the operator specified in section II of this appendixpursuant to a contract with the operator, the operator may provide by contractthat the testing, training and rehabilitation required by its drug testingplan be carried out by the contractor provided that: (1) The operator remainsresponsible for ensuring that the terms of its drug testing plan are compliedwith, (2) the operator remains responsible for ensuring that an employeewho fails the testing does not perform any functions specified in sectionII until successful rehabilitation has taken place, and (3) the contractorshall allow access to property and records by the operator, by State PipelineSafety Representatives, and by RSPA for the purpose of monitoring the operator'scompliance with the requirements of this appendix.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">IX. Recording Results of Drug Testing Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each operator shall maintain a record of the results of its drug testingprogram. Each operator shall permit duly authorized RSPA and State PipelineSafety Personnel to have access to the record. The record shall includethe following information categorized by method of testing:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The functions performed by the employees who tested positive forprohibited drug.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The prohibited drugs which were used by the employees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The disposition of employees who failed the test (e.g., termination,rehabilitation, leave without pay).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. The age of each employee who failed a drug test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. The number of employees tested.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-15095 Filed 7-7-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-60-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>